Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 5

Department of Environment and Conservation

4-3-501. Creation.

There is hereby created the department of environment and conservation.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 1; 1939, ch. 11, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.1; Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; 1963, ch. 169, § 3; modified.

Compiler's Notes. The department of environment and conservation, created by this section and §4-3-101, terminates June 30, 2023. See §§4-29-112,4-29-244.

Cross-References. Creation of the department of environment and conservation, §4-3-101.

Organization, powers and duties of department, title 11, ch. 1.

4-3-502. Commissioner.

The department of environment and conservation shall be under the charge and general supervision of the commissioner of environment and conservation.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 2; 1939, ch. 11, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.2; Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; 1963, ch. 169, § 3; modified.

4-3-503. Establishment of divisions, bureaus and organizational units.

The commissioner is authorized to establish divisions, bureaus or other organizational units necessary to carry out the duties imposed upon the commissioner and the department.

Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1970, ch. 468, § 1; Acts 1972, ch. 852, § 14; 1976, ch. 468, § 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-317; Acts 1986, ch. 912, § 1; 1992, ch. 693, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of the division of forestry and its related functions and the administration of the Tennessee Forestry Act (title 11, ch. 4) from the department of environment and conservation to the department of agriculture, see Executive Order No. 41 (February 4, 1991).

Cross-References. Reorganization of divisions, §4-4-101.

4-3-504. Powers and duties of department.

The department of environment and conservation has the power to:

Exercise all functions, rights, powers, and duties vested by law; and

Make rules and regulations not inconsistent with law for the administration of such functions and duties, and for the management of any parks or other properties belonging to the state.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 69; impl. am. Acts 1949, ch. 50, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 255.62, 5194, 5201.1 (Williams, § 255.72); modified; Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1970, ch. 468, §§ 1-17; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-317; Acts 1992, ch. 693, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of the bureau of environment in the department of health and its related functions and the administration of the Tennessee environmental statutes (excluding title 68, chs. 14, 110 and 112) from the department of health to the department of environment and conservation, see Executive Order No. 42 (February 4, 1991).

For transfer of the division of forestry and its related functions and the administration of the Tennessee Forestry Act (title 11, ch. 4) from the department of environment and conservation to the department of agriculture, see Executive Order No. 41 (February 4, 1991).

For the transfer of the responsibility of administering §§ 17(a), 19, 21(d), 26(c), 29, 34, 36(d) and 45 of the Solid Waste Management Act of 1991, Acts 1991, ch. 451, codified as §§68-211-822(a),68-211-823,68-211-824,68-211-862(c),68-211-825,68-211-828,68-211-867(d) and68-211-847, respectively, relative to certain financial assistance programs, from the state planning office to the department of environment and conservation, see Executive Order No. 50 (November 5, 1991).

For the further transfer of administration of certain provisions of the Solid Waste Management Act from the state planning office to the department of environment and conservation, see Executive Order No. 54 (January 7, 1994).

Cross-References. Coal surface mining, powers of commissioner, §59-8-404.

4-3-505. Deputy and assistant commissioners — Absence or incapacity of commissioner — Vacancy in office.

The commissioner is authorized to appoint such deputy and assistant commissioners as may be necessary to discharge the powers and duties of the department. In the event of absence or incapacity of the commissioner or in the event of a vacancy in the office of the commissioner, an appropriate person designated by the governor may be authorized, in accordance with §4-4-115, to exercise any and all of the powers of the commissioner until such time as the duly appointed commissioner can fulfill such commissioner's responsibilities.

Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-317; Acts 1992, ch. 693, § 8.

4-3-506. Making completeness determinations and issuing or denying permits within time frame specified in department’s rules and regulations.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the department of environment and conservation seek to accomplish making a completeness determination and issuing or denying any permit within the time frames specified by the department's rules and regulations.

The commissioner shall prepare semiannual permitting efficiency reports that include statistics demonstrating whether the department has acted on permit applications within the time frames established by rule. The statistics may be summarized by organizational unit established under § 4-3-503. The reports are due February 1 and August 1 of each calendar year.

The report due February 1 must report data for the first six (6) months of the current fiscal year.

The report due August 1 must report data for the entire previous fiscal year and must also specify any program or system changes to be made if the commissioner determines that program or system changes are necessary to achieve compliance with any time frame.

If a report indicates that a division is not complying with the specified time frames, then the report must include a determination of the cause of the noncompliance.

The reports must be posted on the department's website and electronically submitted to the governor and members of the general assembly.

Acts 2012, ch. 980, § 1; 2020, ch. 593, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-3-506 (Acts 1978, ch. 730, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-317), concerning special police commissions, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 912, § 2. For present provisions, see §11-3-107(b).

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

4-3-507. [Reserved.]

All contracts or leases entered into prior to July l, 1991, by the department of environment and conservation or its predecessor in name, the department of conservation, with any entity, corporation, agency, enterprise or person pertaining to § 11-1-108, title 11, chapter 4, §§ 43-14-218, 54-17-105, 54-17-109 and 67-5-1004, shall continue in full force and effect as to all essential terms and conditions of the contracts in existence on July 1, 1991, to the same extent as if such contracts had originally been entered into by and between such entity, corporation, agency, enterprise or person and the department of agriculture, unless and until such contracts or leases are amended or modified by the parties to such contracts or leases.

All rules, regulations, orders and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by the department of environment and conservation or its predecessor in name, the department of conservation, pursuant to § 11-1-108, title 11, chapter 4, §§ 43-14-218, 54-17-105, 54-17-109 and 67-5-1004, shall remain in full force and effect and shall hereafter be administered and enforced by the department of agriculture. To this end, the department of agriculture, through the commissioner, has the authority, consistent with the statutes and regulations pertaining to the programs and functions transferred in § 11-1-108, title 11, chapter 4, §§ 43-14-218, 54-17-105, 54-17-109 and 67-5-1004, to modify or rescind orders or rules and regulations heretofore issued and to adopt, issue or promulgate new orders or rules and regulations necessary for the administration of the programs or functions of the department of agriculture transferred in this section.

Acts 1992, ch. 693, §§ 19, 20.

4-3-509. License, certification or registration — Notifications — Prerequisites — Website — Notifications by electronic mail.

The department and any division, board, commission, committee, or other governmental entity under the jurisdiction of, or administratively attached to, the department shall notify each applicant for a professional or occupational license, certification or registration from the department, division, board, commission, agency or other governmental entity where to obtain a copy of any statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines setting forth the prerequisites for the license, certification or registration and shall, upon request, make available to the applicant a copy of the statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines.

The department and any division, board, commission, committee, or other governmental entity under the jurisdiction of, or administratively attached to, the department shall notify each holder of a professional or occupational license, certification or registration from the department, division, board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity of changes in state law that impact the holder and are implemented or enforced by the entity, including newly promulgated or amended statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines, upon the issuance and upon each renewal of a holder's license, certification or registration.

The department and any division, board, commission, committee, or other governmental entity under the jurisdiction of, or administratively attached to, the department shall establish and maintain a link or links on the entity's website to the statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines that are implemented or enforced by the entity and that impact an applicant for, or a holder of, a professional or occupational license, certification, or registration from the entity.

The department and any division, board, commission, committee, agency, or other governmental entity under the jurisdiction of, or administratively attached to, the department shall allow each holder of a professional or occupational license, certification or registration from the department, division, board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity to have the option of being notified by electronic mail of:

Renewals of the holder's license, certification or registration;

Any fee increases;

Any changes in state law that impact the holder and are implemented or enforced by the entity, including newly promulgated or amended statutes, rules, policies and guidelines; and

Any meeting where changes in rules or fees are on the agenda. For purposes of this subdivision (d)(1)(D), the electronic notice shall be at least forty-five (45) days in advance of the meeting, unless it is an emergency meeting then the notice shall be sent as soon as is practicable.

The department and any division, board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity under the jurisdiction of, or administratively attached to, the department shall notify each holder of a license, certification or registration of the availability of receiving electronic notices pursuant to subdivision (d)(1) upon issuance or renewal of the holder's license, certification or registration.

Acts 2008, ch. 1070, § 7; 2012, ch. 952, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1070, § 13 provided that each entity subject to the act shall promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

4-3-510. Office of energy programs — General powers.

The office of energy programs has the duty and responsibility to:

Promote research, development, recruitment and investments in conservation and renewable technology business (e.g., businesses that are labor intensive, environmentally sound, energy conserving and compatible with the development of a statewide energy program), with the recognition that a commitment to energy efficiency and development of renewable resources promotes economic growth and job creation;

Provide incentives for energy conservation and renewable technologies development;

Provide informational and educational programs for local governmental units and the general public, including the operation of a toll-free energy hotline;

Administer federal energy programs to include, but not be limited to, an energy extension service and a state energy conservation plan.

Promote state and local energy emergency preparedness in coordination with other appropriate state agencies, such as the military department;

Establish a working liaison with the Tennessee Valley authority and other energy-related nonprofit organizations;

Provide technical assistance to state businesses experiencing financial difficulty due to escalating energy costs;

Maintain a record of businesses lost to the state or that have gone out of business due to escalating energy costs; and

Prepare an annual report on the activities of the office of energy programs, including information on conservation, energy management, renewable industry investments and recruitments, and energy savings goals set and realized by the programs administered by the office of energy programs;

The report shall be submitted to the governor, the speakers of the senate and house of representatives, and the chair of the senate and house of representatives committees on government operations, energy, and conservation, or their successor committees.

Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 7; 2000, ch. 561, § 3; 2009, ch. 105, § 1; 2009, ch. 106, § 7; 2016, ch. 743, §§ 2, 11; T.C.A. §4-3-708.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-3-708 was transferred to this section by Acts 2016, ch. 743, § 11, effective April 7, 2016.

4-3-511. Office of energy programs — Powers concerning promoting research and development.

The office of energy programs has the power in promoting research and development to:

Assist the state, its subdivisions and institutions, private parties, and any energy supplier chartered or regulated under this code, through the collection and compilation of information on energy programs throughout the state and the United States, the coordination of research and experimental projects in this state, and contracts and the issuance of grants to Tennessee institutions and citizens for research and experimentation, in the development of:

Petroleum and natural gas storage or production capacity wherever such can be located;

Coal gasification and liquefaction;

Propane, butane or methane storage, shipment, handling and rapid redistribution to areas of need;

An energy port authority in connection with a grouping and system interconnection of energy loading, unloading, storage and transfer facilities;

Magnetohydrodynamics (MHD), fluidized bed combustion and other advanced combustion and conversion facilities;

Technology and related facilities for the collection, conversion and use of solar energy;

Facilities designed to produce central heating, cooling, electrical energy, or process steam through the combustion of garbage or other wastes;

Other energy production, storage or distribution facilities, including co-generation of power; and

Technology and related facilities for the collection, conversion and use of methane gas. The office of energy programs shall cooperate with the University of Tennessee Space Institute and any other state agency studying the use of methane gas;

Promote and assist in the execution of programs to gain maximum benefit for citizens of Tennessee from the state's natural energy resources, including, but not limited to:

Coal field development and utilization, both surface and subsurface;

Oil deposits;

Natural gas for intrastate and interstate use;

Ores containing fissionable elements;

Geographical characteristics;

Resource recycling; or

Renewable resources;

Coordinate the development of energy facilities in this state; and

Monitor the spending of any public funds provided for projects under this section, and the progress of any work financed in whole or in part with such funds.

Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 7; 1995, ch. 201, § 1; 2016, ch. 743, §§ 3, 11; T.C.A. §4-3-709.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-3-709 was transferred to this section by Acts 2016, ch. 743, § 11, effective April 7, 2016.

4-3-512. Office of energy programs — Powers concerning promoting conservation.

The office of energy programs has the power in promoting conservation to:

Develop and implement plans, projects or programs for the purpose of energy conservation in regard to residential, commercial, industrial or governmental uses of energy;

Coordinate any energy conservation programs or projects undertaken by the state or municipal governments, or by the federal government as permitted by applicable federal law;

Participate in or carry out any federal energy conservation programs;

Recommend, in coordination with other standards and codes, energy and lighting efficiency building standards for new and renovated buildings in this state. Such standards will be mandatory for all building construction or renovation begun after they take effect. Such standards will be administered by local governments, and if such governments have standards equal to or stricter than the authority standards, the local standards will control;

Prepare, implement and administer a plan that encourages utilities to provide conservation services to their customers;

Assist the utilities of the state in their actions before those federal agencies that regulate or otherwise control specific energy supplies, if such actions are consistent with state energy policy;

Coordinate and maintain, in cooperation with other divisions, and state and federal departments and agencies, a comprehensive educational and information program on energy conservation for the general public. The office of energy programs shall make a continuing effort to keep the citizens of the state informed as to the most efficient and expeditious means of reducing their use of energy; and

Develop and carry out its programs on its own initiative, in cooperation with federal, state or local governments, or with private citizens. Such plans, projects or programs may include, but are not limited to:

Van pooling and car pooling plans and incentives;

Home weatherization;

Development of mass transit alternatives;

Incentives to promote residential conservation of energy use;

Compilation and dissemination of energy efficiency information;

Programs to promote energy conservation in industry and commerce;

Encouragement of the use and development within the state of solar, geothermal and other renewable energy resources;

Development of energy management systems; and

Development of material recycling, handling and management systems.

Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 7; 2016, ch. 743, §§ 4, 11; T.C.A. §4-3-710.

Former §4-3-710 was transferred to this section by Acts 2016, ch. 743, § 11, effective April 7, 2016.

4-3-513. Office of energy programs — Set-aside program for petroleum products.

The commissioner of environment and conservation, with the assistance of the office of energy programs shall develop an emergency liquid fuel allocation program to be implemented by the governor in event of an energy emergency as defined in § 58-2-101.

The setting aside of petroleum products will be in order to help meet emergency petroleum requirements, thereby relieving the hardship caused by such shortage to entities including, but not limited to, the following:

Certain governmental entities providing emergency services;

Other entities defined by rules as promulgated by the commissioner;

Energy producers;

Telecommunications services;

Public transit;

Users engaged in agricultural production, planting and harvesting; and

Sanitation services.

The commissioner shall promulgate rules, including emergency rules pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title, to govern the administration of the set-aside program, including, but not limited to, the form, procedures, criteria and priority for set-aside allocation and distribution.

The state set-aside program for petroleum products shall be operated to the extent that it does not preempt federal law.

The state set-aside program shall terminate upon the issuance of an executive order stating that a shortage of petroleum products no longer exists.

The office of energy programs shall assist with contingency plans, in coordination with power distributors in this state, to conserve electrical energy during emergency conditions. Such plans shall include the designation of priority users of electrical power.

Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 7; 2016, ch. 743, §§ 5-7, 11; T.C.A. §4-3-711.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (b), concerning the continued force and effect of rules promulgated and the program developed by the Tennessee energy authority, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 1991.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-3-711 was transferred to this section by Acts 2016, ch. 743, § 11, effective April 7, 2016.

4-3-514. Office of energy programs — Additional powers — Confidentiality.

In furtherance of its duties under §§ 4-3-510–4-3-513 the office of energy programs has the power to:

Collect energy-related information for the purpose of maintaining a current source of relevant data, and for supplying the office of energy programs, as well as other federal and state agencies and the general public, with the necessary information to enable them to make informed evaluations and decisions about energy-related problems;

Perform such studies, analyses or surveys as it deems necessary to carry out the intent and purposes of this chapter. The office of energy programs shall first of all be concerned with providing any studies or analyses of energy information that the governor or appropriate committees of the general assembly shall request. In addition, within limitations of funds, time and staff capacities, the office of energy programs may provide such information for the general public, individual members of the general assembly, and other state and federal authorities;

Maintain current reports on the supply, demand and price of the various energy resources, which shall include, but are not limited to:

Coal;

Electricity;

Geothermal;

Natural gas;

Nuclear power;

Petroleum; and

Solar power;

In maintaining such reports, the office of energy programs shall utilize data available from other state and federal sources to the extent possible to avoid duplication of requests;

Monitor and analyze technological developments in the fields of energy resource exploration, extraction, utilization, production, distribution, conservation and end-product reuse;

Provide an analysis of the availability of various energy resources as well as a forecast of the future demand and availability of those resources, where feasible;

Establish an information distribution system to convey energy-related information to the general public and other interested persons;

Obtain information on and monitor energy-related developments, including the following:

Energy legislation pending before the United States congress;

Proposed energy-related rules and regulations of federal agencies;

Research development and demonstration activities affecting Tennessee;

Federal grants for which citizens or government might apply;

Energy proceedings and hearings of the various energy regulatory agencies;

Energy-related activities and legislation in other states; and

Such other energy-related activities as the head of the office of energy programs may assign;

Coordinate the responses of other state agencies over and above the responses required under office of management and budget circular A-95, to federal energy programs and projects and present those agencies' views to the extent feasible; and

Evaluate the practical, economic and financial feasibility of projects or facilities included under § 4-3-511(3).

The office shall maintain the confidentiality of all proprietary information it may acquire.

“Proprietary information” is defined as trade secrets and commercial or financial information that is used either directly or indirectly in the business of any person submitting information to the office under this chapter, and that gives such person an advantage or an opportunity to obtain an advantage over competitors who do not know or use such information.

Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 7; 2016, ch. 743, §§ 8, 9, 11; T.C.A. §4-3-712.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-3-712 was transferred to this section by Acts 2016, ch. 743, § 11, effective April 7, 2016.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

4-3-515. Office of energy programs — Expenditure of funds.

Any federal funds expended pursuant to §§4-3-510 –4-3-514 shall only be obligated or expended in accordance with the program, terms, conditions and agreement under which such funds were received, unless specific authority to modify such program, terms, conditions or agreement has been received in writing from the granting authority.

Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 27; 2016, ch. 743, §§ 10, 11; T.C.A. §4-3-713.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-3-713 was transferred to this section by Acts 2016, ch. 743, § 11, effective April 7, 2016.